Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1797
Liability insurance.

A credit union may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was an official, employee, or agent of the credit union or who is or was serving at the request of the credit union as an official, employee, or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any liability asserted against such person and incurred by such person in any such capacity or arising out of such person's status as such, whether or not the credit union would have the power to indemnify such person against such liability.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 97.